Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.230

Funeral and burial expenses.

Upon the death of any participant resulting from injuries or sickness in consequence or as the result of the performance of his or her duties, the board of trustees shall authorize the issuance of a voucher for the sum of two thousand dollars, and upon the death of any participant who is receiving any disability payments provided for in this chapter, the board of trustees shall authorize the issuance of a voucher for the sum of five hundred dollars, to help defray the funeral expenses and burial of the participant, which voucher shall be paid in the manner provided for payment of other charges against the principal fund.

[ 1999 c 148 s 21; 1989 c 91 s 20; 1986 c 163 s 3; 1981 c 21 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 76 s 5; 1961 c 57 s 6; 1957 c 159 s 5; 1951 c 103 s 4; 1945 c 261 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-37. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 7; RRS s 9578-7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 21: See notes following RCW 41.24.150.